New Jersey, session 221, S2261.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.2009, c.329 (C.30:1B-6.4) is amended to read as follows: 5.   a.   At the time of release from a State correctional facility, every inmate shall be notified in writing of: (1)   all outstanding fines, assessments, and restitution charges ordered as part of that inmate's sentence[, as well as] ; (2)   all fines or penalties for a violation of the motor vehicle and traffic laws as set forth in Title 39 of the Revised Statutes which were outstanding at the time of incarceration; and (3)   any outstanding warrants or detainers, including those issued by a municipal court. b.    To assist in an inmate's transition and reentry into the community, [no] an inmate shall not be required to pay any portion of any outstanding fine, assessment, or restitution [ordered as part of that inmate's sentence] set forth in subsection a. of this section during the first 90 days following [his] the inmates release. During that 90-day period no warrant shall be issued against the inmate for any nonpayment of any such fine, assessment, or restitution.  After the 90-day period, an inmate shall be permitted to enter into a reasonable payment plan for all fines or penalties for a violation of the motor vehicle and traffic laws as set forth in Title 39 of the Revised Statutes which were outstanding at the time of incarceration. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or in any way impair the inmate's responsibility for paying all such outstanding fines, assessments, and restitutions ordered by the court.  No additional penalties shall be imposed while the inmate is incarcerated on any fines or penalties for a violation of the motor vehicle and traffic laws as set forth in Title 39 of the Revised Statutes which were outstanding at the time of incarceration. (cf: P.L.2009, c.329, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month after enactment, but the Commissioner of Corrections may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.